Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 4 Violations by Guardians

29-2-40.
Petition to resign guardianship; requirements; service; hearing; appointment of successor guardian.

A guardian or the duly authorized guardian, conservator, or attorney in fact of a guardian, acting on behalf of the guardian, may resign upon petition to the court, showing to the satisfaction of the court that:

The guardian is unable to continue to serve due to age, illness, infirmity, or other good cause;

Greater burdens have devolved upon the office of guardian than those that were originally contemplated or should have been contemplated when the guardian was qualified and the additional burdens work a hardship upon the guardian;

Disagreement exists between the minor and the guardian or between the guardian and the conservator in respect of the guardian’s care of the minor, which disagreement and conflict appear to be detrimental to the minor;

The resignation of the guardian will result in or permit substantial financial benefit to the minor; or

The resignation would not be disadvantageous to the minor.

The petition for resignation shall include the name of a suitable person who is willing to accept the guardianship.

Personal service of the petition for resignation shall be made upon the minor and a guardian ad litem appointed by the court for the minor. Service shall be made by first-class mail to the parents of the minor in the event of the resignation of a temporary guardian, to the conservator of the minor, if any, and, in the following order of preference, to the following relatives of the minor whose whereabouts are known and who must be persons other than the resigning guardian or the proposed successor guardian:

The adult siblings of the minor; provided, however, that not more than three adult siblings need be served;

If there is no adult sibling of the minor, the grandparents of the minor; provided, however, that not more than three grandparents need be served; or

If there is no grandparent of the minor, any three of the nearest adult relatives of the minor determined according to Code Section 53-2-1.

If after such hearing as the court deems appropriate, the court is satisfied that the petition for the resignation of the guardian and the appointment of the successor guardian should be granted, the court shall enter an order appointing the successor guardian in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 29-2-51 and accept the resignation, subject to the resigning guardian turning over to the successor guardian or conservator all property of the minor held by the guardian.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 29/HB 142.

29-2-41.
Appointment of successor guardian.

In the event of the death of a guardian, and upon the petition of an interested person or upon the court’s own motion, the court shall appoint a successor guardian. The court shall notify the minor and any guardian ad litem appointed for the minor by personal service. Notice shall be given by first-class mail to the conservator of the minor, if any, to the personal representative of the deceased guardian, if any, and, in the following order of preference, to the following relatives of the minor whose whereabouts are known and who must be persons other than the proposed successor guardian:

The adult siblings of the minor; provided, however, that not more than three adult siblings need be served;

If there is no adult sibling of the minor, the grandparents of the minor; provided, however, that not more than three grandparents need be served; or

If there is no grandparent of the minor, any three of the nearest adult relatives of the minor determined according to Code Section 53-2-1.

After such hearing as the court deems appropriate, the court shall enter an order appointing a successor guardian in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 29-2-51 requiring the personal representative of the deceased guardian to turn over to the successor guardian all property of the minor held by the guardian.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 29/HB 142.

29-2-42.
Requirement of guardian to answer charges affecting obligations as guardian; revocation of guardianship; impact on other proceedings.

Upon the petition of any interested person or whenever it appears to the court that good cause may exist to revoke or suspend the letters of guardianship or to impose sanctions, the court shall cite the guardian to answer the charge. The court shall investigate the allegations and may require such accounting as the court deems appropriate. The court may appoint a temporary substitute guardian for the minor during the investigation.

Upon investigation the court may in its discretion:

Revoke or suspend the letters of guardianship;

Require additional security;

Reduce or deny compensation to the guardian or impose such other sanction or sanctions as the court deems appropriate; and

Issue any other order as in the court’s judgment is appropriate under the circumstances of the case.

The revocation or suspension of letters of guardianship shall not abate any action pending for or against the guardian. The successor guardian shall be made a party to the action in the manner provided in Code Section 9-11-25.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95.

Law reviews.

For article on the problems and benefits of multiple fiduciaries in estate planning, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 355 (1981).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (2008).

29-2-43.
Minor’s cause of action for breach of guardian’s fiduciary duties.

If a guardian commits a breach of fiduciary duty or threatens to commit a breach of fiduciary duty, a minor or an interested person on behalf of the minor shall have a cause of action as appropriate:

To recover damages;

To compel performance of the guardian’s duties;

To enjoin the commission of a breach of fiduciary duty; or

To compel the redress of a breach of fiduciary duty by payment of money or otherwise.

When the minor’s assets are misapplied and can be traced into the hands of persons who have notice of the misapplication, a trust shall attach to the assets.

The provision of remedies for breach of fiduciary duty by this Code section does not prevent resort to any other appropriate remedy provided by statute or common law.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-2-44.
Statute of limitations.

All actions against a guardian, except on the guardian’s bond, shall be brought within six years of the termination of the guardianship of the minor, except as provided in Code Section 9-3-90.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-44

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article, “Some Problems in Providing for Nonjudicial Settlement of the Trustee’s Accounts,” see 3 Ga. St. B.J. 417 (1967).

For article, “Fiduciary Problems of the Executor and Trustee: Conflicts of Interest, Violations of Fiduciary Duties, Surcharge, and Other Remedies of Beneficiaries,” see 9 Ga. St. B.J. 187 (1972).